Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-37,105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
75-37,105. (a) As used in this section,:
(1) "Award" and "monetary award" include a bonus given to an
employee pursuant to this section; and
(2) "state agency" has the meaning ascribed thereto by means the
same as defined in K.S.A. 75-3701, and amendments thereto, and includes
the governor's department, lieutenant governor, attorney general, secretary
of state, state treasurer, commissioner of insurance, each agency of the
executive branch, the legislature and each agency of the legislative branch,
the judicial branch and each agency of the judicial branch and any
appointed state council or state commission.
(b) (1) There is established an employee award and recognition
program for state employees. Under this program, monetary or non-
monetary nonmonetary awards may be made to state employees. An
appointing authority may implement a program of award and recognition
for classified and unclassified employees or teams of employees. Such
program may include a hiring, recruitment and retention bonus, as well as
awards for distinguished accomplishment, meritorious service,
innovations, Kansas quality management, volunteerism or length of
service. Under this program, monetary or non-monetary nonmonetary
awards may be made to state employees. Non-monetary Nonmonetary
awards may include, but are not be limited to, a medal, an annual award
luncheon held by the employee's respective state agency or public
recognition by the Kansas house of representatives or the Kansas senate.
(2) All awards and recognition provided under this section shall meet

HB 2237 2
the conditions for a discretionary bonus set out in 29 C.F.R. § 778.211.
(c) (1) The total gross value of awards to any employee of the state
during a single fiscal year shall not exceed $3,500 except as provided in
subsection (g) $10,000.
(2) Any monetary award or series of such awards in excess of $3,500
that is proposed for an employee in the classified service or an employee
in the unclassified service whose salary is subject to approval in
accordance with K.S.A. 75-2935b, and amendments thereto, shall be
subject to approval by the governor and shall not be paid until approved
by the governor, except as provided in subsection (g).
(d) No award paid pursuant to this section during the fiscal year shall
be compensation, within the meaning of K.S.A. 74-4901 et seq., and
amendments thereto, for any purpose under the Kansas public employees
retirement system and shall not be subject to deductions for employee
contributions thereunder. Each taxable award paid under this section shall
be a discretionary bonus, as defined by 29 C.F.R. § 778, and shall be in
addition to the regular earnings to which that employee may be entitled or
for which the employee may become eligible. Monetary awards are subject
to taxes in accordance with federal internal revenue code regulations. The
value of non-monetary nonmonetary awards shall be reported by state
agencies in accordance with sections 74 and 132 of the federal internal
revenue code and procedures prescribed by the director of accounts and
reports.
(d)(e) The award and recognition program shall be paid from moneys
appropriated and available for operating expenditures of the state agency
or from other funding sources as appropriated. In the case of employee
suggestions, the award or recognition for each employee shall be paid or
provided by the state agency that benefited from and implemented the
suggestion.
(e) The regulations of the employee award board adopted pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-37,108, and amendments thereto, are hereby revoked.
(f) The secretary of administration shall adopt rules and regulations
that provide oversight and administrative review of state agency award and
recognition programs for executive branch agencies and appointed state
councils and commissions. The secretary of administration shall adopt
rules and regulations to Such oversight shall provide safeguards to
preclude opportunities for abuse within the employee award and
recognition program in each state agency and to programs and provide for
consistency of such programs among such agencies, councils and
commissions as well as ensure objective decision-making procedures in
award and recognition determinations for all participating employees.
(g) (1) (A) The secretary of administration shall establish a state
employee suggestion program through which state employees may submit

HB 2237 3
suggestions for cost reductions to their respective state agency through
increased efficiencies or other economies or savings in the operations of
the state agency.
(B) Each employee making a suggestion for cost reduction shall be
awarded a monetary or non-monetary nonmonetary employee award or
awards for innovation pursuant to subsection (b) of this section upon
adoption of the suggestion by the state agency. Monetary awards for
innovation shall be nondiscretionary and shall be in the amount of 10% of
the cost reduction, accrued during the first 12 months after implementation
of the suggestion, as documented to the division of the budget, up to a
maximum of $5,000. Should multiple employees make similar suggestions
for cost reduction, as determined by the state agency, each employee shall
submit to the head of the state agency a list of each employee's percentage
contribution to the suggestion for cost reduction. Upon adoption of the
suggestion by the state agency, the head of the state agency shall make the
final determination as to each employee's percentage contribution. Such
multiple employees shall then share the documented cost reduction in such
percentage shares as determined by the head of the state agency, up to a
maximum of $5,000 per employee.
(C) The state agency shall retain 10% of the documented cost
reduction. Savings achieved through this cost reduction shall be placed in
a separate special revenue fund or funds for such purpose to be
administered by that state agency. The remaining balance of the savings
achieved through this cost reduction shall revert to the state general fund.
(2) Each state agency shall submit each suggestion it that such
agency receives, together with the state agency's estimated cost reduction,
if any, and dispensation of the suggestion to the division of the budget. The
director of the budget shall file copies with the director of the legislative
research department, who shall report annually on the information to
members of the legislative budget committee.
(3) Each state agency that has awarded an employee under the state
agency's employee suggestion program pursuant to this subsection shall
report all information related to the award to the secretary of
administration.
(4) At the beginning of each regular session of the legislature, the
secretary of administration shall provide all information received by state
agencies pursuant to subsection (g)(3) to the appropriate committees of the
legislature.
(5) The secretary of administration shall provide all information
regarding the state employee suggestion program to all state agencies by a
pamphlet, brochure or by publication on the official website of the
department of administration.
(h) Awards and incentives and other recognition pursuant to this

HB 2237 4
section shall not be deemed in violation of K.S.A. 46-237a, and
amendments thereto.
(i) Any person elected or appointed to a state agency position shall
not be a recipient of a monetary award under this section.
(j) Annually, on August 1, each state agency that has awarded an
employee with a monetary award pursuant to this section shall submit to
the secretary of administration a report on the number of monetary
awards paid in each category of awards or bonuses and the total dollar
amount of each such award or bonus for the previous fiscal year. At the
beginning of each regular session of the legislature, the secretary shall
compile and report such information to the house of representatives
committee on appropriations and the senate committee on ways and
means.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-37,105 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.